Utah statutes.
78B-1-211.   Video recording of testimony of hearing-impaired person.

The appointing authority, on his or her own motion or on the motion of a party to the proceedings, may order that the testimony of the hearing-impaired person and its interpretation be electronically recorded by a video recording device for use in verification of the official transcript of the proceedings.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

